Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 4. Procedures.

§ 63.2-1516.
Tape recording child abuse investigations.

Any person who is suspected of abuse or neglect of a child and who is the subject of an investigation or family assessment pursuant to this chapter may tape record any communications between him and child-protective services personnel that take place during the course of such investigation or family assessment, provided all parties to the conversation are aware the conversation is to be recorded. The parties’ knowledge of the recording shall be demonstrated by a declaration at the beginning of the recorded portion of the conversation that the recording is to be made. If a person who is suspected of abuse or neglect of a child and who is the subject of an investigation or family assessment pursuant to this chapter elects to make a tape recording as provided in this section, the child-protective services personnel may also make such a recording.

History.

1990, c. 867, § 63.1-248.6:2; 2000, c. 500; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1516.01.
Investigation procedures involving person who is the subject of complaint.

The local department shall, at the initial time of contact with the person subject to a child abuse and neglect investigation, advise such person of the complaints or allegations made against the person, in a manner that is consistent with laws protecting the rights of the person making the report or complaint. In cases where a child is alleged to have been abused or neglected by a teacher, principal or other person employed by a local school board or employed in a school operated by the Commonwealth, in the course of such employment in a nonresidential setting, the provisions of §

63.2-1516.1

shall also apply.

History.

2004, cc. 93, 233.

§ 63.2-1516.1.
Investigation procedures when school employee is subject of the complaint or report; release of information in joint investigations.

Except as provided in subsection B of this section, in cases where a child is alleged to have been abused or neglected by a teacher, principal or other person employed by a local school board or employed in a school operated by the Commonwealth, in the course of such employment in a nonresidential setting, the local department conducting the investigation shall comply with the following provisions in conducting its investigation:

The local department shall conduct a face-to-face interview with the person who is the subject of the complaint or report.

At the onset of the initial interview with the alleged abuser or neglector, the local department shall notify him in writing of the general nature of the complaint and the identity of the alleged child victim regarding the purpose of the contacts.

The written notification shall include the information that the alleged abuser or neglector has the right to have an attorney or other representative of his choice present during his interviews. However, the failure by a representative of the Department of Social Services to so advise the subject of the complaint shall not cause an otherwise voluntary statement to be inadmissible in a criminal proceeding.

Written notification of the findings shall be submitted to the alleged abuser or neglector. The notification shall include a summary of the investigation and an explanation of how the information gathered supports the disposition.

The written notification of the findings shall inform the alleged abuser or neglector of his right to appeal.

The written notification of the findings shall inform the alleged abuser or neglector of his right to review information about himself in the record with the following exceptions:

The identity of the person making the report.

Information provided by any law-enforcement official.

Information that may endanger the well-being of the child.

The identity of a witness or any other person if such release may endanger the life or safety of such witness or person.

In all cases in which an alleged act of child abuse or neglect is also being criminally investigated by a law-enforcement agency, and the local department is conducting a joint investigation with a law-enforcement officer in regard to such an alleged act, no information in the possession of the local department from such joint investigation shall be released by the local department except as authorized by the investigating law-enforcement officer or his supervisor or the local attorney for the Commonwealth.

Failure to comply with investigation procedures does not preclude a finding of abuse or neglect if such a finding is warranted by the facts.

History.

2003, cc. 986, 1013.

Law Review.

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

§ 63.2-1517.
Authority to take child into custody.

A physician or child-protective services worker of a local department or law-enforcement official investigating a report or complaint of abuse and neglect may take a child into custody for up to 72 hours without prior approval of parents or guardians provided:

The circumstances of the child are such that continuing in his place of residence or in the care or custody of the parent, guardian, custodian or other person responsible for the child’s care, presents an imminent danger to the child’s life or health to the extent that severe or irremediable injury would be likely to result or if evidence of abuse is perishable or subject to deterioration before a hearing can be held;

A court order is not immediately obtainable;

The court has set up procedures for placing such children;

Following taking the child into custody, the parents or guardians are notified as soon as practicable. Every effort shall be made to provide such notice in person;

A report is made to the local department; and

The court is notified and the person or agency taking custody of such child obtains, as soon as possible, but in no event later than 72 hours, an emergency removal order pursuant to § 16.1-251; however, if a preliminary removal order is issued after a hearing held in accordance with § 16.1-252 within 72 hours of the removal of the child, an emergency removal order shall not be necessary. Any person or agency petitioning for an emergency removal order after four hours have elapsed following taking custody of the child shall state the reasons therefor pursuant to § 16.1-251.

If the 72-hour period for holding a child in custody and for obtaining a preliminary or emergency removal order expires on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed, the 72 hours shall be extended to the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed.

A child-protective services worker of a local department responding to a complaint or report of abuse and neglect for purposes of sex trafficking or severe forms of trafficking may take a child into custody and the local department may maintain custody of the child for up to 72 hours without prior approval of a parent or guardian, provided that the alleged victim child or children have been identified as a victim or victims of sex trafficking or a victim or victims of severe forms of trafficking as defined in the federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act of 2000 (22 U.S.C. § 7101 et seq.) and in the federal Justice for Victims of Trafficking Act of 2015 (P.L. 114-22). After taking the child into custody, the local department shall notify the parent or guardian of such child as soon as practicable. Every effort shall be made to provide such notice in person. The local department shall also notify the Child-Protective Services Unit within the Department whenever a child is taken into custody.

When a child is taken into custody by a child-protective services worker of a local department pursuant to subsection C, that child shall be returned as soon as practicable to the custody of his parent or guardian. However, the local department shall not be required to return the child to his parent or guardian if the circumstances are such that continuing in his place of residence or in the care or custody of such parent or guardian, or custodian or other person responsible for the child’s care, presents an imminent danger to the child’s life or health to the extent that severe or irremediable injury would be likely to result or if the evidence of abuse is perishable or subject to deterioration before a hearing can be held. If the local department cannot return the child to the custody of his parents or guardians within 72 hours, the local department shall obtain an emergency removal order pursuant to § 16.1-251.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.9; 1977, c. 559; 1992, c. 688; 1994, c. 643; 1998, c. 760; 2001, c. 837; 2002, c. 747; 2003, c. 508; 2019, cc. 381, 687.

Cross references.

As to local boards of social services accepting temporary custody of persons under 18 years of age taken into custody pursuant to § 16.1-246 B or §

63.2-1517

, see §

63.2-900

.

As to permanent foster care placements, see §

63.2-908

. As to authority to consent to surgical and medical treatment of certain minors, see §

54.1-2969

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 508 substituted “72” for “seventy-two” throughout the section; substituted “Every effort shall be made to provide such notice in person” for “that he is in custody” at the end of subdivision A 4; and added the last sentence to subdivision A 6.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 381 and 687 are identical, and added subsections C and D.

Law Review.

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

§ 63.2-1518.
Authority to talk to child or sibling.

Any person required to make a report or conduct an investigation or family assessment, pursuant to this chapter may talk to any child suspected of being abused or neglected or to any of his siblings without consent of and outside the presence of his parent, guardian, legal custodian, or other person standing in loco parentis, or school personnel.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.10; 1979, c. 453; 1986, c. 308; 2000, c. 500; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1519.
Physician-patient and spousal privileges inapplicable.

In any legal proceeding resulting from the filing of any report or complaint pursuant to this chapter, the physician-patient and spousal privileges shall not apply.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.11; 2002, c. 747; 2020, c. 900.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 900 substituted “spousal” for “husband-wife.”

Law Review.

For comment on confidential communication privileges under federal and Virginia law, see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 593 (1979).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 9 Discovery. § 9.04 Privileges against discovery. Bryson.

§ 63.2-1520.
Photographs and X-rays of child; use as evidence.

In any case of suspected child abuse, photographs and X-rays of the child may be taken without the consent of the parent or other person responsible for such child as a part of the medical evaluation. Photographs of the child may also be taken without the consent of the parent or other person responsible for such child as a part of the investigation or family assessment of the case by the local department or the court; however, such photographs shall not be used in lieu of medical evaluation. Such photographs and X-rays may be introduced into evidence in any subsequent proceeding.

The court receiving such evidence may impose such restrictions as to the confidentiality of photographs of any minor as it deems appropriate.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.13; 1978, c. 553; 2000, c. 500; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1521.
Testimony by child using two-way closed-circuit television.

In any civil proceeding involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to § 16.1-241, 16.1-251, 16.1-252, 16.1-253, 16.1-253.1, 16.1-253.4, 16.1-278.14, 16.1-279.1, 16.1-283, or

20-107.2

, the child’s attorney or guardian ad litem or, if the child has been committed to the custody of a local department, the attorney for the local department may apply for an order from the court that the testimony of the alleged victim or of a child witness be taken in a room outside the courtroom and be televised by two-way closed-circuit television. The person seeking such order shall apply for the order at least seven days before the trial date.

The provisions of this section shall apply to the following:

An alleged victim who was 14 years of age or under on the date of the alleged offense and is 16 or under at the time of the trial; and

Any child witness who is 14 years of age or under at the time of the trial.

The court may order that the testimony of the child be taken by closed-circuit television as provided in subsections A and B if it finds that the child is unavailable to testify in open court in the presence of the defendant, the jury, the judge, and the public, for any of the following reasons:

The child’s persistent refusal to testify despite judicial requests to do so;

The child’s substantial inability to communicate about the offense; or

The substantial likelihood, based upon expert opinion testimony, that the child will suffer severe emotional trauma from so testifying.Any ruling on the child’s unavailability under this subsection shall be supported by the court with findings on the record or with written findings in a court not of record.

In any proceeding in which closed-circuit television is used to receive testimony, the attorney for the child and the defendant’s attorney and, if the child has been committed to the custody of a local board, the attorney for the local board shall be present in the room with the child, and the child shall be subject to direct and cross examination. The only other persons allowed to be present in the room with the child during his testimony shall be the guardian ad litem, those persons necessary to operate the closed-circuit equipment, and any other person whose presence is determined by the court to be necessary to the welfare and well-being of the child.

The child’s testimony shall be transmitted by closed-circuit television into the courtroom for the defendant, jury, judge and public to view. The defendant shall be provided with a means of private, contemporaneous communication with his attorney during the testimony.

History.

1988, c. 845, § 63.1-248.13:1; 1999, c. 668; 2002, c. 747; 2018, c. 564.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 564 inserted “16.1-253.1, 16.1-253.4, 16.1-278.14, 16.1-279.1” in the first sentence of subsection A; and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

As to testimony by child victims using two-way closed-circuit television, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 691 (1988).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-215. Child Protective Order — Abuse and Neglect.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

20 M.J. Witnesses, § 9.

§ 63.2-1522.
Admission of evidence of sexual acts with children.

In any civil proceeding involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to § 16.1-241, 16.1-251, 16.1-252, 16.1-253, 16.1-283, or

20-107.2

, an out-of-court statement made by a child 14 years of age or younger at the time the statement is offered into evidence, describing any act of a sexual nature performed with or on the child by another, not otherwise admissible by statute or rule, may be admissible in evidence if the requirements of subsection B are met.

An out-of-court statement may be admitted into evidence as provided in subsection A if:

The child testifies at the proceeding, or testifies by means of a videotaped deposition or closed-circuit television, and at the time of such testimony is subject to cross-examination concerning the out-of-court statement or the child is found by the court to be unavailable to testify on any of these grounds:

The child’s death;

The child’s absence from the jurisdiction, provided such absence is not for the purpose of preventing the availability of the child to testify;

The child’s total failure of memory;

The child’s physical or mental disability;

The existence of a privilege involving the child;

The child’s incompetency, including the child’s inability to communicate about the offense because of fear or a similar reason; and

The substantial likelihood, based upon expert opinion testimony, that the child would suffer severe emotional trauma from testifying at the proceeding or by means of a videotaped deposition or closed-circuit television.

A statement may not be admitted under this section unless the proponent of the statement notifies the adverse party of his intention to offer the statement and the substance of the statement sufficiently in advance of the proceedings to provide the adverse party with a reasonable opportunity to prepare to meet the statement, including the opportunity to subpoena witnesses.

In determining whether a statement possesses particularized guarantees of trustworthiness and reliability under subdivision B 2, the court shall consider, but is not limited to, the following factors:

The child’s personal knowledge of the event;

The age and maturity of the child;

Certainty that the statement was made, including the credibility of the person testifying about the statement and any apparent motive such person may have to falsify or distort the event including bias, corruption, or coercion;

Any apparent motive the child may have to falsify or distort the event, including bias, corruption, or coercion;

The timing of the child’s statement;

Whether more than one person heard the statement;

Whether the child was suffering pain or distress when making the statement;

Whether the child’s age makes it unlikely that the child fabricated a statement that represents a graphic, detailed account beyond the child’s knowledge and experience;

Whether the statement has internal consistency or coherence, and uses terminology appropriate to the child’s age;

Whether the statement is spontaneous or directly responsive to questions;

Whether the statement is responsive to suggestive or leading questions; and

Whether extrinsic evidence exists to show the defendant’s opportunity to commit the act complained of in the child’s statement.

The court shall support with findings on the record, or with written findings in a court not of record, any rulings pertaining to the child’s unavailability and the trustworthiness and reliability of the out-of-court statement.

2.

The child’s out-of-court statement is shown to possess particularized guarantees of trustworthiness and reliability.

History.

1988, c. 892, § 63.1-248.13:2; 2002, c. 747; 2019, c. 413.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 413, in subsection A, substituted “14 years of age or younger” for “the age of twelve or under”; and made stylistic changes.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-215. Child Protective Order — Abuse and Neglect.

§ 63.2-1523.
Use of videotaped statements of complaining witnesses as evidence.

In any civil proceeding involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to § 16.1-241, 16.1-251, 16.1-252, 16.1-253, 16.1-283, or

20-107.2

, a recording of a statement of the alleged victim of the offense, made prior to the proceeding, may be admissible as evidence if the requirements of subsection B are met and the court determines that:

The alleged victim is 14 years of age or younger at the time the statement is offered into evidence;

The recording is both visual and oral, and every person appearing in, and every voice recorded on, the tape is identified;

The recording is on videotape or was recorded by other electronic means capable of making an accurate recording;

The recording has not been altered;

No attorney for any party to the proceeding was present when the statement was made;

The person conducting the interview of the alleged victim was authorized to do so by the child-protective services coordinator of the local department;

All persons present at the time the statement was taken, including the alleged victim, are present and available to testify or be cross examined at the proceeding when the recording is offered; and

The parties or their attorneys were provided with a list of all persons present at the recording and were afforded an opportunity to view the recording at least 10 days prior to the scheduled proceedings.

A recorded statement may be admitted into evidence as provided in subsection A if:

The child testifies at the proceeding, or testifies by means of closed-circuit television, and at the time of such testimony is subject to cross-examination concerning the recorded statement or the child is found by the court to be unavailable to testify on any of these grounds:

The child’s death;

The child’s absence from the jurisdiction, provided such absence is not for the purpose of preventing the availability of the child to testify;

The child’s total failure of memory;

The child’s physical or mental disability;

The existence of a privilege involving the child;

The child’s incompetency, including the child’s inability to communicate about the offense because of fear or a similar reason;

The substantial likelihood, based upon expert opinion testimony, that the child would suffer severe emotional trauma from testifying at the proceeding or by means of closed-circuit television; and

A recorded statement may not be admitted under this section unless the proponent of the statement notifies the adverse party of his intention to offer the statement and the substance of the statement sufficiently in advance of the proceedings to provide the adverse party with a reasonable opportunity to prepare to meet the statement, including the opportunity to subpoena witnesses.

In determining whether a recorded statement possesses particularized guarantees of trustworthiness and reliability under subdivision B 2, the court shall consider, but is not limited to, the following factors:

The child’s personal knowledge of the event;

The age and maturity of the child;

Any apparent motive the child may have to falsify or distort the event, including bias, corruption, or coercion;

The timing of the child’s statement;

Whether the child was suffering pain or distress when making the statement;

Whether the child’s age makes it unlikely that the child fabricated a statement that represents a graphic, detailed account beyond the child’s knowledge and experience;

Whether the statement has a “ring of verity,” has internal consistency or coherence, and uses terminology appropriate to the child’s age;

Whether the statement is spontaneous or directly responsive to questions;

Whether the statement is responsive to suggestive or leading questions; and

Whether extrinsic evidence exists to show the defendant’s opportunity to commit the act complained of in the child’s statement.

The court shall support with findings on the record, or with written findings in a court not of record, any rulings pertaining to the child’s unavailability and the trustworthiness and reliability of the recorded statement.

2.

The child’s recorded statement is shown to possess particularized guarantees of trustworthiness and reliability.

History.

1988, c. 900, § 63.1-248.13:3; 2002, c. 747; 2019, c. 413.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 413, in subdivision A 1, substituted “14 years of age or younger” for “the age of twelve or under”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 63.2-1524.
Court may order certain examinations.

The court may order psychological, psychiatric and physical examinations of the child alleged to be abused or neglected and of the parents, guardians, caretakers or siblings of a child suspected of being neglected or abused.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.14; 1976, c. 186; 2002, c. 747.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 32 Juvenile Domestic Relations Courts; § 32.02 Proceedings in Juvenile and Domestic Relations Courts. Friend.

§ 63.2-1525.
Prima facie evidence for removal of child custody.

In the case of a petition in the court for removal of custody of a child alleged to have been abused or neglected, competent evidence by a physician that a child is abused or neglected shall constitute prima facie evidence to support such petition.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.15; 2002, c. 747.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Illustrative cases. —

Although parents claimed they did not cause their 11-month-old daughter’s injuries and did not allow someone else to cause her injuries, a doctor’s testimony that the child displayed symptoms of shaken baby syndrome was sufficient for the court to find that the child was abused or neglected within the meaning of § 16.1-228, and the court found that the child was abused or neglected and that her two-year-old brother was a child at risk of being abused or neglected because of the injuries his sister sustained. In re McBride, 60 Va. Cir. 261, 2002 Va. Cir. LEXIS 391 (Richmond Oct. 23, 2002).

§ 63.2-1526.
Appeals of certain actions of local departments.

A person who is suspected of or is found to have committed abuse or neglect may, within 30 days of being notified of that determination, request the local department rendering such determination to amend the determination and the local department’s related records. Upon written request, the local department shall provide the appellant all information used in making its determination. Disclosure of the reporter’s name or information which may endanger the well-being of a child shall not be released. The identity of a collateral witness or any other person shall not be released if disclosure may endanger his life or safety. Information prohibited from being disclosed by state or federal law or regulation shall not be released. The local department shall hold an informal conference or consultation where such person, who may be represented by counsel, shall be entitled to informally present testimony of witnesses, documents, factual data, arguments or other submissions of proof to the local department. With the exception of the local director, no person whose regular duties include substantial involvement with child abuse and neglect cases shall preside over the informal conference. If the local department refuses the request for amendment or fails to act within 45 days after receiving such request, the person may, within 30 days thereafter, petition the Commissioner, who shall grant a hearing to determine whether it appears, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the determination or record contains information which is irrelevant or inaccurate regarding the commission of abuse or neglect by the person who is the subject of the determination or record and therefore shall be amended. A person who is the subject of a report who requests an amendment to the record, as provided above, has the right to obtain an extension for an additional specified period of up to 60 days by requesting in writing that the 45 days in which the local department must act be extended. The extension period, which may be up to 60 days, shall begin at the end of the 45 days in which the local department must act. When there is an extension period, the 30-day period to request an administrative hearing shall begin on the termination of the extension period.

The Commissioner shall designate and authorize one or more members of his staff to conduct such hearings. The decision of any staff member so designated and authorized shall have the same force and effect as if the Commissioner had made the decision. The hearing officer shall have the authority to issue subpoenas for the production of documents and the appearance of witnesses. The hearing officer is authorized to determine the number of depositions that will be allowed and to administer oaths or affirmations to all parties and witnesses who plan to testify at the hearing. The Board shall adopt regulations necessary for the conduct of such hearings. Such regulations shall include provisions stating that the person who is the subject of the report has the right (i) to submit oral or written testimony or documents in support of himself and (ii) to be informed of the procedure by which information will be made available or withheld from him. In case of any information withheld, such person shall be advised of the general nature of such information and the reasons, for reasons of privacy or otherwise, that it is being withheld. Upon giving reasonable notice, either party at his own expense may depose a nonparty and submit such deposition at the hearing pursuant to Board regulation. Upon good cause shown, after a party’s written motion, the hearing officer may issue subpoenas for the production of documents or to compel the attendance of witnesses at the hearing, except that alleged child victims of the person and their siblings shall not be subpoenaed, deposed or required to testify. The person who is the subject of the report may be represented by counsel at the hearing. Upon petition, the court shall have the power to enforce any subpoena that is not complied with or to review any refusal to issue a subpoena. Such decisions may not be further appealed except as part of a final decision that is subject to judicial review. Such hearing officers are empowered to order the amendment of such determination or records as is required to make them accurate and consistent with the requirements of this chapter or the regulations adopted hereunder. If, after hearing the facts of the case, the hearing officer determines that the person who is the subject of the report has presented information that was not available to the local department at the time of the local conference and which if available may have resulted in a different determination by the local department, he may remand the case to the local department for reconsideration. The local department shall have 14 days in which to reconsider the case. If, at the expiration of 14 days, the local department fails to act or fails to amend the record to the satisfaction of the appellant, the case shall be returned to the hearing officer for a determination. If aggrieved by the decision of the hearing officer, such person may obtain further review of the decision in accordance with Article 5 (§

2.2-4025

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

Whenever an appeal of the local department’s finding is made and a criminal charge or investigation is also filed or commenced against the appellant for the same conduct involving the same victim as investigated by the local department, the appeal process shall automatically be stayed until the criminal prosecution in the trial court is completed, until the criminal investigation is closed, or, in the case of a criminal investigation that is not completed within 180 days of the appellant’s request for an appeal of the local department’s finding, for 180 days after the appellant’s request for appeal. During such stay, the appellant’s right of access to the records of the local department regarding the matter being appealed shall also be stayed. Once the criminal prosecution in the trial court has been completed, the criminal investigation is closed, or, in the case of a criminal investigation that is not completed within 180 days of the appellant’s request for an appeal of the local department’s finding, 180 days have passed, the local department shall advise the appellant in writing of his right to resume his appeal within the time frames provided by law and regulation.

History.

1988, c. 407, § 63.1-248.6:1; 1993, cc. 188, 955, 963; 1995, c. 7; 2002, c. 747; 2019, cc. 12, 296.

Cross references.

As to jurisdiction of juvenile and domestic relations district courts, see § 16.1-241. As to the confidentiality of the proceedings and the sealing of the record in cases involving child abuse and neglect appealed to the circuit court, see §

17.1-513.1

. As to regulations governing licensure of teachers, see § 22.1-298.1. As to grounds for dismissal of teachers, see § 22.1-307.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 12 and 296 are identical, and in subsection C, substituted “or investigation is also filed or commenced” for “is also filed” and substituted “the trial court is completed, until the criminal investigation is closed, or, in the case of a criminal investigation that is not completed within 180 days of the appellant’s request for an appeal of the local department’s finding, for 180 days after the appellant’s request for appeal” for “circuit court is completed” in the first sentence and substituted “the trial court has been completed, the criminal investigation is closed, or, in the case of a criminal investigation that is not completed within 180 days of the appellant’s request for an appeal of the local department’s finding, 180 days have passed” for “circuit court has been completed” in the third sentence; and made stylistic changes.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1 Courts. § 1.05 District Courts; Chapter 32 Juvenile Domestic Relations Courts; § 32.02 Proceedings in Juvenile and Domestic Relations Courts. Friend.